Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-1402. Powers and duties.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To adopt rules to meet the purposes of this subchapter;

To adopt specific design criteria on the post-closure of solid waste landfills to limit the types and kinds of uses of closed landfills to protect the safety of the environment and limit the possible exposure of the public to any harm; and

To administer and enforce all laws and rules relating to this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 718, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 579, 580.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1) and (3).

8-6-1403. Rules.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall adopt rules for specific criteria:

To limit any person, partnership, company, corporation, or other entity from building, erecting, or constructing any house or building for residential purposes upon any land used as or which has been used as a solid waste landfill; and

To identify those houses and other buildings located on any land used as or which has been used as a solid waste landfill and are currently being used for residential purposes and to limit their future use for residential purposes.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 718, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 581.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” from the end of the section heading; and, in the introductory language, deleted “Within six (6) months after August 13, 1993” from the beginning, and deleted “and promulgate regulations” following “rules”.

8-6-1404. Land use.

Six (6) months after August 13, 1993, it shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, company, corporation, or other entity to build, erect, or construct any house, home, or building to be used for residential purposes upon any land used as or which has been used as a solid waste landfill permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

On August 13, 1993, those houses, homes, and other buildings located on any land used as or which has been used as a solid waste landfill and which are currently being used for residential purposes shall be allowed to remain on that land and may be used for residential purposes.

The prohibitions of this subchapter and any rules promulgated under this subchapter's authority shall be limited to application to the area of the land which was specifically used as a landfill for the placement and disposal of solid waste.

The prohibitions of this subchapter and any rules promulgated under this subchapter's authority shall not apply to landfills or the land which was specifically used as a landfill more than twenty-five (25) years before August 13, 1993.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 718, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 582.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in (c)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(2).

8-6-1405. Violations.

Any person who violates the provisions of this subchapter shall be subject to the civil penalties prescribed in § 8-6-204.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 718, § 4.

Subchapter 15
— Siting High Impact Solid Waste Management Facilities

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1263, § 5, provided: “This act repeals and supersedes the provisions of Arkansas Code 8-6-218.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2005, No. 1781, § 3: Apr. 6, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1263 of 1993 is an act that is important to public health and welfare of citizens located near high impact solid waste management facilities. Ambiguities in the current language of Act 1263 of 1993 impair the ability of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality to protect the public health and welfare and a delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the ability of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality to effectively administer its regulatory functions and properly implement the public health protections provided through Act 1263 of 1993. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1501. Legislative intent.

Through extensive legislation since 1989, the State of Arkansas has made significant strides toward a comprehensive and regionalized approach to solid waste management. The General Assembly recognizes the need to develop viable facilities for managing and disposing of the state's solid waste. This subchapter should be construed as a complement to the state's overall regionalization strategy by encouraging an equitable and efficient dispersal of solid waste management facilities to serve the needs of all citizens.

The General Assembly also acknowledges that, while solid waste management facilities are essential, certain types of solid waste management facilities impose specific burdens on the host community. National trends indicate a tendency to concentrate high impact solid waste disposal facilities in lower-income or minority communities. Such high impact solid waste disposal facilities may place an onus on the host community without any reciprocal benefits to local residents. The purpose of this subchapter is to prevent communities from becoming involuntary hosts to a proliferation of high impact solid waste management facilities.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1263, § 1.

8-6-1502. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Hazardous substance sites” means the same as set out in § 8-7-503;

“Hazardous waste” means the same as set out in § 8-7-203;

“High impact solid waste management facility” means, excluding the facilities described in subdivision (3)(B) of this section, any solid waste landfill, any solid or commercial hazardous waste incinerator, and any commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility.

“High impact solid waste management facility” does not include the following:

Recycling or composting facilities;

Waste tire management sites;

Solid waste transfer stations;

Solid waste landfills which have applications pending for either increased or new acreage or provisions for additional services or increased capacity;

A facility dedicated solely to the treatment, storage, or disposal of solid waste or hazardous waste generated by a private industry when the private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the facility solely for the disposal of waste generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character;

A facility or activity dedicated solely to a response action at a location listed by the state or United States Government as a hazardous substance site;

An existing facility operating under the interim status of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., or implementing rules of the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., or the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Code; or

Expansion of existing hazardous waste facilities under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., or the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., either through increased acreage or provision for additional services or increased capacity;

“Host community” means the closest governmental unit as measured along major facility access roads and highways exercising zoning authority encompassed within a twelve-mile radius of the site of a proposed high impact solid waste management facility;

“Permitting” means any governmental authorization to proceed with construction or operation of a facility or activity required by either state law or local ordinance; and

“Solid waste” means the same as set out in § 8-6-702.

However, “solid waste” does not include hazardous waste as defined in this section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1263, § 2; 2005, No. 1781, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 583.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1781, § 1, provided:

“Legislative findings — Purpose.

“(a)

For purposes of this act, the General Assembly finds:

“(1)

Following the adoption of Acts 1993, No. 1263 the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission adopted rules interpreting Act 1963, No. 1263 by defining host community as the closest community to the proposed high impact solid waste management facility; and

“(2)

While this definition varied from the statutory definition, it did address a potential ambiguity in the statute.

“(b)

The purpose of this act is to codify the interpretation that has been followed by the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality since the adoption of Acts 1963, No. 1263.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (3)(B)(vii).

8-6-1503. Division's permitting authority.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall not process any application for a permit subject to § 8-6-1504 until the affected local and regional authorities have issued definitive findings regarding the criteria set out in § 8-6-1504.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1263, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 2695.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division’s” for “Department’s” in the section heading; and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-1504. Presumption against certain sites.

There shall be a rebuttable presumption against permitting the construction or operation of any high impact solid waste management facility, as defined in this subchapter, within twelve (12) miles of any existing high impact solid waste management facility.

This presumption shall be honored by the Division of Environmental Quality, the regional solid waste management board with jurisdiction over the site, and any other governmental entity with permitting or zoning authority concerning any facility.

The presumption in subsection (a) of this section can be rebutted if any of the following is shown:

That no other suitable site for such a high impact solid waste management facility is available within the regional solid waste management district because of the restraints of geology or any other factors listed at § 8-6-706(b)(2); or

That incentives have prompted the host community to accept the siting of the high impact solid waste management facility.

Such incentives may include, without limitation:

Increased employment opportunities;

Reasonable host fees not to exceed the prevailing state average;

Contributions by the high impact solid waste management facility to the community infrastructure, e.g. road maintenance, park development, and litter control;

Compensation to adjacent individual landowners for any assessed decrease in property values; or

Subsidization of community services.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1263, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 83; 2019, No. 910, § 2696.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2).

Subchapter 16
— Financial Assurance

Effective Dates.

Acts 1995, No. 510, § 5: Mar. 2, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this statute is needed in order to make state requirements compatible with federal regulations. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 938, § 9: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year begins on July 1, and that this emergency clause is necessary in order that uniformity can be achieved at the beginning of the 1997-1998 fiscal year for money deposited into the Landfill Post-Closure Trust Fund and the moneys allocated from that fund for the Illegal Dump Eradication and Corrective Action Program. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1601. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to establish the procedure for posting financial assurance for all permitted solid waste management facilities.

The procedure for issuance of permits for solid waste management facilities shall be as provided in the rules adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under this subchapter or as otherwise provided by law.

After an application to operate a solid waste management facility has been reviewed and approved but before a permit is issued, the applicant shall post with the Division of Environmental Quality, on forms prescribed by the division in accordance with the rules issued under this subchapter, a corporate surety bond for performance or an acceptable alternative, such as a certificate of deposit or letter of credit payable to the division and conditioned upon faithful performance of all requirements of this subchapter, the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, and the permit, including, but not limited to, proper closure of the solid waste management facility.

Liability under the bond shall be for the duration of the disposal operation and for that period required to properly close the solid waste management facility and for post-closure care, in accordance with the rules issued by the commission.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 510, § 1; 1999, No. 758, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 84; 2019, No. 315, § 584; 2019, No. 910, § 2697.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” throughout (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (c)(1), substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and substituted “division” for “department” twice.

8-6-1602. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Active life” means the period of operation beginning with the initial receipt of solid waste and ending at completion of closure activities;

[Repealed.]

“Closure plan” means a written plan that describes the steps necessary to close any solid waste management facility at any point during its active life in accordance with the design requirements in rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, as applicable;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

“Disposal site” or “disposal facility” means any place at which solid waste is dumped, abandoned, or accepted or disposed of for final disposition by incineration, landfilling, composting, or any other method;

“Existing municipal solid waste landfill unit” means any municipal solid waste landfill unit that was receiving solid waste as of October 9, 1993, or April 9, 1994, as applicable to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, Subtitle D.

Waste placement in existing units must be consistent with past operating practices or modified practices to ensure good management;

“Facility” means all contiguous land and structures, other appurtenances, and improvements on the land used for the disposal, treatment, or processing of solid waste;

“Land application unit” means an area where wastes are applied onto or incorporated into the soil surface, excluding manure and wastewater treatment sludge spreading operations, for agricultural purposes or for treatment and disposal;

“Lateral expansion” means a horizontal expansion of the waste boundaries of an existing municipal solid waste landfill unit;

“Municipal solid waste landfill unit” means a discrete area of land or an excavation that receives household waste and that is not a land application unit, surface impoundment, injection well, or waste pile.

A municipal solid waste landfill unit also may receive other types of Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, Subtitle D wastes, such as commercial solid waste, nonhazardous sludge, small quantity generator waste, and industrial solid waste.

Such a landfill may be publicly or privately owned.

A municipal solid waste landfill unit may be a new municipal solid waste landfill unit, an existing municipal solid waste landfill unit, or a lateral expansion;

“New municipal solid waste landfill unit” means any municipal solid waste landfill unit that has not received waste prior to October 9, 1993, or April 9, 1994, as applicable;

“Operator” means the person responsible for the overall operation of a facility or part of a facility;

“Owner” means the person who owns a facility or part of a facility;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, state agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or other legal entity, however organized;

“Post-closure plan” means a written plan that provides a description of monitoring and maintenance activities required in rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and includes the frequency with which these activities will be performed;

“RCRA, Subtitle D” means the United States Environmental Protection Agency, Office of Solid Waste, Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and the August 1991 Addendum for the Final Criteria for Municipal Solid Waste Landfills, 40 C.F.R. part 258;

“Solid waste management system” means the entire process of storage, collection, transportation, processing, treatment, and disposal of solid waste and includes equipment, facilities, and operations designed for solid waste management activities, including recycling, source reduction, and the enforcement of solid waste management laws and ordinances;

“State” means the State of Arkansas; and

“Surface impoundment” or “impoundment” means a facility or part of a facility that is a natural topographic depression, human-made excavation, or diked area formed primarily of earthen materials, although it may be lined with human-made materials, that is designed to hold an accumulation of liquid wastes or wastes containing free liquids and that is not an injection well.

Examples of surface impoundments are holding, storage, settling, and aeration pits, ponds, and lagoons.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 510, § 1; 1999, No. 758, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 85; 2019, No. 315, §§ 585, 586; 2019, No. 693, § 17; 2019, No. 910, § 2698.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (3) and (16).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 repealed (2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (5).

U.S. Code.

Subtitle D of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976
is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 6941 et seq.

8-6-1603. Procedures generally.

Financial Assurance for Closure.

The owner or operator must have a detailed written estimate, in current dollars, of the cost of hiring a third party to close the largest area of the facility requiring closure as required under the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and the permit during the active life of the facility in accordance with the closure plan.

The cost estimate shall equal the cost of closing the largest area of any solid waste management facility requiring closure at any time during its active life when the extent and manner of its operation would make closure the most expensive, as indicated by its closure plan.

During the active life of the solid waste management facility, the owner or operator shall annually adjust the closure cost estimate for inflation.

The owner or operator shall establish financial assurance for closure of any permitted solid waste management facility in compliance with the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and the permit.

The owner or operator of any solid waste management facility shall provide continuous financial assurance coverage for closure until released from financial assurance requirements by demonstrating compliance with rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and the permit.

The amount of financial assurance shall be in accordance with § 8-6-1002(e) and the rules issued in § 8-6-1002(e).

Financial Assurance for Post-closure Care.

The owner or operator shall have a detailed written estimate, in current dollars, of the cost of hiring a third party to conduct post-closure care in compliance with the post-closure plan developed under the rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and the permit.

The cost estimate for post-closure care shall be based on the most expensive costs of post-closure care during the post-closure care period.

During the active life of the solid waste management facility and during the post-closure care period, the owner or operator shall annually adjust the post-closure cost estimate for inflation.

The owner or operator shall establish financial assurance for costs of post-closure care of any permitted solid waste management facility in compliance with rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and the permit.

The owner or operator of any solid waste management facility shall provide continuous financial assurance coverage for post-closure care until released from financial assurance requirements for post-closure care by demonstrating compliance with rules issued pursuant to this subchapter and the permit.

Financial Assurance for Corrective Action.

The owner or operator, if required to undertake a corrective action program under rules issued pursuant to this subchapter, shall have a detailed written estimate, in current dollars, of the cost of hiring a third party to perform the corrective action in accordance with rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.

The owner or operator of any solid waste management facility shall establish financial assurance for the most recent corrective action program.

The owner or operator shall provide continuous coverage for corrective action until released from financial assurance requirements for corrective action by demonstrating compliance with rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.

Allowable Mechanisms.

The mechanisms used to demonstrate financial assurance under this section shall ensure that the funds necessary to meet the costs of closure, post-closure care, and corrective action for known releases will be available whenever they are needed.

The financial mechanisms shall be legally valid, binding, and enforceable under state and federal law.

Owners and operators shall choose from the options specified in rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.

A municipality or county that owns or operates a solid waste management facility receiving any non-RCRA, Subtitle D waste may, in lieu of a performance bond, execute a contract of obligation with the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

The contract of obligation shall be a binding agreement on the municipality or county, allowing the director or his or her designee to collect any general revenues being disbursed or to be disbursed from the state to the municipality or county on the failure of the municipality or county to fulfill the financial assurance requirements of this subchapter and rules issued pursuant to this subchapter.

To assure that adequate funds necessary to meet the estimated costs for closure and post-closure care of any non-RCRA, Subtitle D solid waste management facility are available whenever they are needed, the estimated annual general revenue amount pledged under a contract of obligation shall be at least equal to but not less than the estimated annual cost for closure and post-closure care to satisfy the financial assurance requirements for closure and post-closure care of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 510, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 4; 1999, No. 758, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 86; 2019, No. 315, §§ 587-594; 2019, No. 910, § 2699.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (d)(4)(A).

8-6-1604. Solid Waste Performance Bond Fund.

A Solid Waste Performance Bond Fund is hereby established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

In addition to any moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund, there shall be deposited into the fund all forfeitures collected under this subchapter, United States Government moneys designated to enter the fund, any moneys received by the state as a gift or donation to the fund, and all interest earned upon moneys deposited into the fund.

The fund shall be administered by the Division of Environmental Quality and will be used to accomplish remedial action, including closure of lands covered by performance bonds forfeited under this subchapter.

Moneys received annually into the fund shall be used by the division for the administration of remedial actions performed as a result of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 510, § 1; 1997, No. 938, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2700.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d).

Cross References.

Solid Waste Performance Bond Fund, § 19-5-1031.

Subchapter 17
— Open Burning of Residential Yard Waste

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1701. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Open burning” means the incineration or combustion of waste materials as a method of disposal without any means to control the fuel/air ratio. None of the activities exempted from rules as air pollution in § 8-4-305 or in rules adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall constitute “open burning”, provided such activities do not cause a fire or safety hazard; and

“Yard waste” means grass clippings, leaves, and shrubbery trimmings collected from residential property.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1151, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 595.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in (1).

8-6-1702. State policy concerning disposal of yard waste.

It is the policy of this state that the open burning of residential yard waste should be discouraged and that alternative methods of yard waste disposal should be developed and made readily available to all citizens. In enforcement of this policy, the state and local governments should first pursue educational and voluntary compliance efforts, with punitive sanctions reserved as the last resort to address instances of localized nuisances, fire and safety hazards, or refusal to obey reasonable demands to cease open burning when alternative disposal methods are available.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1151, § 2.

8-6-1703. Restrictions on open burning of yard waste.

The open burning of yard waste is discouraged. Enforcement shall be through informal educational efforts, unless such efforts are proven to be manifestly ineffective in preventing specific instances of open burning.

No citation or civil fine shall be issued or levied against the owner of a private residence for the open burning of brush or yard waste unless such open burning constitutes:

A persistent or recurring offense to surrounding landowners, as determined by complaints to state or local officials;

A fire hazard to surrounding property, as determined by appropriate local officials; or

A safety hazard causing obscured vision on public roads or highways.

No citation or civil fine shall be issued or levied pursuant to the exception of subdivision (b)(1) of this section unless first preceded by a warning order or other appropriate notification delivered to the alleged violator by certified mail, restricted delivery, or other appropriate mechanism of legal service, indicating that a local or state agency has received a complaint concerning open burning activities. Such order or notification need not reveal the identity of the complainants. This order or notification shall advise the alleged violator of alternatives to open burning of yard waste.

As used in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, “persistent or recurring” burning includes activities that are seasonal or annual. Each day of any event of open burning that continues following executed service of a warning order or notification may justify a citation or civil fine unless the alleged violator takes reasonably diligent measures to extinguish or control the fire.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as impairing the authority of local fire control officials to abate fire hazards through whatever regulatory mechanisms deemed necessary and appropriate.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as impairing the authority of the Division of Environmental Quality to abate reasonably likely exceedances of National Ambient Air Quality Standards.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1151, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 87; 2019, No. 910, § 2701.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (e).

Cross References.

National Ambient Air Quality Standards implementation, § 8-4-318.

8-6-1704. Private rights unchanged.

This subchapter shall not be construed as impairing common law private rights of action.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1151, § 4.

Subchapter 18
— Animal Waste

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1801. Management plan — Substitution.

If the Division of Environmental Quality requires a person to obtain an animal waste management plan, including a permit application, prepared by a professional engineer as defined in § 17-30-101, the person may substitute a plan prepared under the supervision of a professional engineer employed by one (1) of the following agencies:

A conservation district;

The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

The United States Natural Resources Conservation Service; or

The University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 415, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 88; 2011, No. 897, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 2702.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “as defined in § 17-30-101” in the introductory language; and substituted “Arkansas Natural Resources Commission” for “Arkansas Soil and Water Conservation Commission” in (2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language.

Subchapter 19
— Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1901. Title.

This subchapter may be known and cited as the “Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan Act”.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1376, § 1.

8-6-1902. Findings.

The General Assembly makes the following findings:

The Division of Environmental Quality has been charged by the General Assembly with the responsibility of developing the Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan which, when feasible, gives emphasis to regional planning;

The difficult task of addressing the complex solid waste needs of the state on a regional basis has been accomplished by creating regional solid waste management boards;

The need for a Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan remains; and

The development and implementation of a Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan is necessary to protect the public's health and the state's environmental quality and to maximize the efficiency of regional solid waste management systems.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1376, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2703.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (1).

8-6-1903. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” or “regional board” means a regional solid waste management board established pursuant to § 8-6-701 et seq.; and

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

[Repealed.]

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1376, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2704.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (3).

8-6-1904. Development and implementation.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall develop the Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan to establish minimum requirements for all regional solid waste management plans, including requirements for:

Strategic planning;

Reporting;

Public notice and participation;

Services; and

Solutions to problems and issues.

Within one (1) year after the Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan becomes final, each regional solid waste management board shall develop a regional solid waste management plan for division review and approval, which includes the minimum requirements contained in the Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan. This new regional solid waste management plan shall replace any existing regional solid waste management plan previously developed.

Failure of any board to develop or implement any requirement contained in the Statewide Solid Waste Management Plan shall subject the board to:

The penalty and enforcement provisions contained in § 8-6-204; or

Denial, discontinuation, or reimbursement of any funding administered by the division to the board.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may adopt reasonable rules necessary to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1376, § 1; 2013, No. 1153, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 596; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2705, 2706.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “pursuant to § 8-6-717” at the end of (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2).

Subchapter 20
— Environmental Compliance Resource Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 11, provided:

“(a)

The purpose of this act is to have the Environmental Compliance Resource Program operational and to make illegal dump control officers unnecessary on or before May 1, 2020.

“(b)

If legislation concerning the transformation of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is enacted during this Regular Session of the General Assembly, the Arkansas Code Revisor and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall correct the references to the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality consistent with those laws”.

While Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 5, specifically repealed § 8-6-501 et seq. “effective May 1, 2020”, section 11 of that act appears to assume that should the Environmental Compliance Resource Program established in this subchapter become operational before May 1, 2020, then § 8-6-501 et seq. is superseded at that point in time, and is permanently repealed on May 1, 2020, whether the program is operational or not on that date.